fi: Postimerkin muoto: Lohko; Vihko (kokonainen); Vihkolehti; Rullamerkki (rulla); Rullamerkki (yksittäinen); Rullamerkki (liuska); Kokonainen arkki; Pienoisarkki; Pari; Yksittäinen; Muistoarkki; Liuska; Muu
el: Μορφή γραμματόσημου: Μπλοκ; Βιβλιαράκι (πλήρες); Φύλλο από βιβλιαράκι; Ρολό (ολοκληρωμένο); Ρολό (μονό γραμματόσημο); Ρολό (σειρά); Πλήρες φύλλο; Μίνι φύλλο; Ζεύγος; Μονό; Αναμνηστικό φύλλο; Ταινία; Άλλο
fr: Format du timbre-poste: Bloc; Carnet (complet); Feuillet de carnet; Rouleau; Timbre de rouleau (à l’unité); Bande de rouleau; Feuille entière; Mini-feuille; Paire; À l’unité; Bloc-feuillet; Bande; Autre
pl: Format znaczka pocztowego: Blok; Zeszycik (kompletny); Karta z zeszyciku; Zwój (rolka); Znaczek ze zwoju (pojedynczy); Znaczki ze zwoju (pasek); Pełny arkusz; Miniarkusz; Para; Pojedynczy; Arkusz pamiątkowy; Pasek; Inne
zh-TW: 郵票形式: 方連; 郵票冊 (完整); 郵票冊內頁; 卷筒 (整卷); 卷筒 (單枚); 卷筒 (連票); 全張; 小全張; 雙連票; 單枚; 紀念小型張; 連票; 其他
pt-PT: Formato do selo postal: Bloco; Livrete (completo); Painel de livrete; Bobina (rolo); Bobina (individual); Bobina (tira); Folha completa; Minifolha; Par; Individual; Bloco comemorativo; Tira; Outro
da: Frimærkeformat: Blok; Hæfte (komplet); Hæfteark; Rulle (hel); Rulle (enkeltmærke); Rulle (stribe); Helt ark; Miniark; Par; Enkeltmærke; Souvenirark; Stribe; Andet
bg-BG: Формат на пощенска марка: Блок; Книжка (пълна); Лист от книжка; Ролка; От ролка (единична); От ролка (лента); Пълен лист; Мини лист; Двойка; Единична; Сувенирен блок; Лента; Друго
lt-LT: Pašto ženklo formatas: Blokas; Bukletas (pilnas); Bukleto lapas; Ritė (ritinėlis); Ritė (viena); Ritė (juostelė); Pilnas lapas; Mini lapas; Pora; Vienetas; Suvenyrinis lapas; Juostelė; Kita
nl: Postzegel formaat: Blok; Postzegelboekje (compleet); Boekjesvel; Rol (rol); Rol (enkel); Rol (strook); Volledig vel; Minivel; Paar; Enkel; Herdenkingsvel; Strook; Overig
ro-RO: Formatul timbrului poștal: Bloc; Carnet (complet); Foaie de carnet; Rolă; Timbru din rolă (individual); Fâșie din rolă; Coală completă; Minicoală; Pereche; Individual; Coliță; Fâșie; Altele
es: Formato de sello postal: Bloque; Libreta (completa); Panel de libreta; Bobina (rollo); Bobina (individual); Bobina (tira); Pliego completo; Minipliego; Par; Individual; Hoja bloque; Tira; Otro
tr: Posta pulu formatı: Blok; Kitapçık (tam); Kitapçık sayfası; Rulo (sarmal); Sarmal (tek); Sarmal (şerit); Tam sayfa; Mini sayfa; Çift; Tek; Anı sayfası; Şerit; Diğer
cs: Formát poštovní známky: Blok; Sešitek (kompletní); Sešitkový list; Cívka (role); Cívková známka (jednotlivá); Cívková známka (proužek); Celý arch; Aršík; Dvojice; Jednotlivá známka; Pamětní aršík; Proužek; Jiné
hu: Postabélyeg formátuma: Blokk; Füzet (teljes); Füzetív; Tekercs (göngyöleg); Tekercs (egyes); Tekercs (csík); Teljes ív; Kisív; Pár; Egyes; Emlékív; Csík; Egyéb
it: Formato del francobollo: Blocco; Libretto (completo); Foglio di libretto; Bobina (rotolo); Bobina (singola); Bobina (striscia); Foglio intero; Minifoglio; Coppia; Singolo; Foglietto ricordo; Striscia; Altro
nb: Frimerkeformat: Blokk; Hefte (komplett); Hefteblokk; Frimerkerull (rull); Frimerkerull (enkeltmerke); Frimerkerull (stripe); Helt ark; Miniark; Par; Enkeltmerke; Suvenirark; Stripe; Annet
de: Format der Briefmarke: Block; Markenheftchen (komplett); Markenheftchenblatt; Rollenmarke (Rolle); Rollenmarke (einzeln); Rollenmarke (Streifen); Ganzer Bogen; Kleinbogen; Paar; Einzelmarke; Briefmarkenblock; Streifen; Sonstige
sl-SI: Oblika poštne znamke: Blok; Zvezek (celoten); Pola zvezka; Zvitek (rola); Zvitek (posamezna); Zvitek (trak); Cela pola; Mala pola; Par; Posamezna; Priložnostni blok; Trak; Drugo
hr-HR: Format poštanske marke: Blok; Knjižica (potpuna); Listić knjižice; Svitak (rola); Svitak (pojedinačno); Svitak (traka); Cijeli arak; Mali arak; Par; Pojedinačno; Prigodni arak; Traka; Ostalo
vi: Định dạng tem bưu chính: Khối; Sổ xé (hoàn chỉnh); Tờ trong sổ xé; Cuộn (tròn); Cuộn (đơn); Cuộn (dải); Nguyên tờ; Tờ mini; Cặp; Tem đơn; Tờ tem kỷ niệm; Dải tem; Khác
ja: 切手形式: ブロック; ブックレット (完全版); ブックレットペイン; コイル (ロール); コイル (単片); コイル (ストリップ); フルシート; ミニシート; ペア; 単片; 小型シート; ストリップ; その他
pt-BR: Selo postal formato: Bloco; Livreto (completo); Folha de livreto; Bobina (rolo); Bobina (único); Bobina (tira); Folha completa; Minifolha; Par; Único; Folha comemorativa; Tira; Outros
ru: Формат почтовых марок: Блок; Буклет (полный); Лист буклета; Рулонная марка (рулон); Рулонная марка (одна); Рулонная марка (полоска); Полный марочный лист; Малый лист; Пара; Одиночная; Почтовый блок; Полоска; Другое
sv: Frimärkesformat: Fyrblock; Häfte (komplett); Häftesblad; Rullfrimärken (rulle); Rullfrimärke (singel); Rullfrimärken (remsa); Helkarta; Minikarta; Par; Singel; Souvenirark; Remsa; Annat
zh-CN: 邮票版式: 邮票块; 小本票（完整）; 小本票内页; 卷筒票（整卷）; 卷筒票（单枚）; 卷筒票（连票）; 整版; 小版张; 双连票; 单枚; 小型张; 连票; 其他
sk-SK: Formát poštovej známky: Blok; Zošitok (kompletný); Zošitkový list; Kotúč (rolka); Kotúč (jeden kus); Kotúč (pásik); Celý list; Minilist; Dvojica; Samostatná známka; Pamätný list; Pásik; Iný
en: Postage stamp format: Block; Booklet (complete); Booklet pane; Coil (roll); Coil (single); Coil (strip); Full sheet; Mini sheet; Pair; Single; Souvenir sheet; Strip; Other
ko: 우표 형식: 블록; 소책자(전체); 소책자 페인; 코일(롤); 코일(단일); 코일(스트립); 전지; 소형 시트; 페어; 낱장; 기념 시트; 스트립; 기타
th: รูปแบบแสตมป์ไปรษณีย์: บล็อก; สมุดตราไปรษณียากร (สมบูรณ์); แผ่นดึงสมุดตราไปรษณียากร; ม้วน (ทั้งม้วน); ม้วน (ดวงเดี่ยว); ม้วน (แถบ); เต็มแผ่น; แผ่นเล็ก; คู่; เดี่ยว; แผ่นชีทที่ระลึก; แถบ; อื่นๆ